Connecticut, session 2026, SB00390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Transportation shall conduct a study relating to the expansion of
microtransit. For purposes of this section, "microtransit" means a
technology-enabled transportation service that uses multipassenger
vehicles to provide on-demand services with dynamically generated
routing. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) An
analysis of designated service areas appropriate for microtransit; (2) the
estimated utilization of microtransit in identified service areas; (3) a
timeline for implementation of a microtransit program; and (4) the
potential costs of and sources of funding for such program. Not later
than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report of the
results of such study to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation and
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 390
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2